Georgia, session 2025_26, HB153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-8-3.2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to sales and use
tax exemptions for manufacturing equipment, industrial materials, packing supplies, and
energy, is amended by revising paragraph (12) of subsection (e), as follows:
"(12) For the period commencing on July 1, 2021, and ending on June 30, 2026, 2031,
maintenance and replacement parts for machinery or equipment, stationary or in transit,
used to mix, agitate, and transport freshly mixed concrete in a plastic and unhardened
state, including but not limited to mixers and components, engines and components,
interior and exterior operational controls and components, hydraulics and components,
all structural components, and all safety components, provided that sales and use taxes
H. B. 153
- 1 -

LC 50 1014/AP
on motor fuel used as energy in a concrete mixer truck shall not be exempt or refundable;
and"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 153
- 2 -